Utah statutes.
78A-6-1207.   Fees.

(1)  Youth Courts may require that the youth pay a reasonable fee, not to exceed $30, to participate in Youth Court.  This fee may be reduced or waived by the Youth Court in exigent circumstances.  This fee shall be paid to and accounted for by the sponsoring entity.

(2)  Fees for classes, counseling, treatment, or other educational programs that are the disposition of the Youth Court are the responsibility of the participant.

